Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Legislative.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 42 — 44, 62 — 78, 84 — 86.

Sec. 15.35.020.
Election of legislature.

One-half of the members of the state senate and all members of the state house of representatives shall be elected at each general election in accordance with the apportionment articles of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 7.31 ch 83 SLA 1960)